Maine, session 132, LD476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1603, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Prohibition on loose polystyrene packing material. After January 1, 2027, a
person may not sell or offer to sell in this State any product composed in whole or in part
of loose polystyrene pieces used for packing material.